Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Artificial Intelligence is established.
(2) The task force consists of 14 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint  one member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint:
(A) Three members who represent business leagues, including trade or professional  as-
sociations.
(B) Two members who represent public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(C) One member who represents local governments.
(D) One member who represents consumer advocacy groups.
(E) One member who has expertise in ethics and technology.
(F) One member who is from the Legislative Fiscal Office.
(d) The Chief  Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint one member who is from the
Judicial Department.
(e) One member shall be the Attorney General or a designee of the Attorney General.
(f) One member shall be  the State Chief Information Officer or a designee of the State
Chief Information Officer.
(3) The two members appointed from the  Legislative Assembly may not be from the same
political party.
(4) All voting members of the task force must have expertise in  two or more of the fol-
lowing areas:
(a) Computer science.
(b) Artificial intelligence.
(c) Technology industries.
(d) Workforce development.
(e) Data privacy.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 1
(5) The task force shall examine and  identify terms and definitions related to artificial
intelligence that are used in technology-related fields and  may be used for legislation. The
task force shall begin its work by examining the terms  and definitions used by the United
States government and relevant federal agencies.  The terms and definitions identified by the
task force for use in legislation must align as closely as  possible with terms and definitions
used in federal rules.
(6) The task force shall seek input from  a broad range of stakeholders, including
stakeholders from institutions of higher education, consumer  advocacy groups and small,
medium and large businesses affected by artificial intelligence policies.
(7) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(8) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(9) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(10) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(11) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(12) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(13) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and
shall include recommendations for terms and definitions that may be used for state legis-
lation, to an interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly related to information manage-
ment and technology no later than December 1, 2024.
(14) The Legislative Policy and  Research Director shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(15) The member who is from the Legislative Fiscal Office is a nonvoting member of the
task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(16) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(17) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 2
Passed by House March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4153 (HB 4153-A) Page 3